Arkansas, session 2025, HB1375.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 25, Chapter 43, Subchapter 3, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
25-43-306. Report concerning funds supporting organizations or
programs for individuals starting new businesses or businesses established
within the previous five years.
(a) By January 1 of each year the Secretary of the Department of
Commerce shall file an annual report that includes without limitation:
(1) The percentage of workforce development funding, including
without limitation funding allocated by workforce development boards across
the state, supporting organizations or programs:
(A) For individuals starting new businesses in this state;
or
*MBM106*
01/31/2025 2:58:44 PM MBM106

HB1375
(B) That provide services to businesses established within
the previous five (5) years whose principal place of business is in this
state; and
(2) The total dollar amount of workforce development funding,
including without limitation funding allocated by workforce development
boards across the state, supporting organizations or programs:
(A) For individuals starting new businesses in this state;
or
(B) That provide services to businesses established within
the previous five (5) years whose principal place of business is in this
state.
(b) The annual report under subsection (a) of this section shall be
filed with the:
(1) Governor;
(2) House Committee on Insurance and Commerce; and
(3) Senate Committee on Insurance and Commerce.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. The first annual
report under § 25-43-306 is due by January 1, 2027.

















01/31/2025 2:58:44 PM MBM106